Illinois, session 104th, HB13.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Foster care credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92025, there shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 10by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an 11amount equal to the foster care expenses paid or incurred, not 12to exceed $1,000 in any taxable year, for each qualifying 13dependent child legally cared for by the foster care parent in 14Illinois. The tax credit under this Section may be claimed for 15the taxable year in which the foster care parent becomes the 16legal guardian of a foster child. The taxpayer must be under 17contract with the Department of Children and Family Services 18and providing care to the qualifying dependent child for at 19least 6 months during the taxable year to receive the full 20credit. If the taxpayer is under contract with the Department 21of Children and Family Services and providing care to the 22qualifying dependent child for less than 6 months during the 23taxable year, then the taxpayer is entitled to a credit in an   HB0013- 2 -LRB104 03342 HLH 13364 b1amount equal to: the lesser of (i) the foster care expenses 2paid or incurred by the taxpayer or (ii) $1,000; multiplied by 3a fraction the numerator of which is the number of days during 4the taxable year during which the taxpayer is under contract 5with the Department of Children and Family Services and 6providing care to the qualifying dependent child and the 7denominator of which is 365. 8    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 9taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of the 10credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 11be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for the 5 12taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 13shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 14liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 15available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be 16applied first. 17    (c) The Department of Children and Family Services, in 18collaboration with the Department of Revenue, shall adopt any 19necessary rules to implement this Section. 20    (d) As used in this Section, "qualifying dependent child" 21means a person who is an Illinois resident in the custody of 22the Department of Children and Family Services who is the 23foster child of the taxpayer seeking a credit under this 24Section. 25    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 26250.    HB0013- 3 -LRB104 03342 HLH 13364 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.